North Carolina, session 2025, HB1070.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 50-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 50-6. Divorce after separation of one year on application of either party.
(a) Marriages may be dissolved and the parties thereto divorced from the bonds of
matrimony on the application of either party, if and when the husband and wife have lived
separate and apart for one year, and the plaintiff or defendant in the suit for divorce has resided
in the State for a period of six months. A divorce under this section shall not be barred to either
party by any defense or plea based upon any provision of G.S. 50-7, a plea of res judicata, or a
plea of recrimination. Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 50-11, or of the common law, a
divorce under this section shall not affect the rights of a dependent spouse with respect to alimony
which have been asserted in the action or any other pending action.
(b) If a person in the marriage is a victim of domestic violence, as defined under
G.S. 50B-1, and the person's spouse by marriage is responsible for committing that act of
domestic violence, the person who is the victim of domestic violence may seek a divorce without
having to meet the one-year period of separation. In making application for divorce pursuant to
this subsection, the applicant shall have divorce granted by satisfying one of the following:
(1) Entering of a Domestic Violence Protection order with findings, against the
person's spouse by marriage who is responsible for committing that act of
domestic violence.
(2) Entering of a conviction for a domestic violence-related offense of the person's
spouse by marriage who is responsible for committing that act of domestic
violence.
(3) By order of a judge following an evidentiary hearing that includes
consideration of factors, including, but not limited to, the following:
a. Law enforcement, court, or other federal or State agency records or
files.
b. Documentation from a domestic violence program, if the applicant is
alleged to be the victim of domestic violence.
c. Documentation from a medical or other professional from whom the
applicant has sought assistance in dealing with the alleged domestic
violence.
*H1070-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Whether there has been a resumption of marital relations during the period of
separation shall be determined pursuant to G.S. 52-10.2. Isolated incidents of sexual intercourse
between the parties shall not toll the statutory period required for divorce predicated on separation
of one year."
SECTION 2. This act does not affect cases pending when this act becomes law.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to The Women's Center, Inc., a nonprofit
organization doing business as Compass Center, to be used to support victims of domestic
violence.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes law
and applies to actions commenced on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 1070-First Edition